Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB643.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4 of the act of October 27, 1955 (P.L.744, No.222), known as the Pennsylvania Human Relations Act, is amended by adding clauses to read:Section 4. Definitions.--As used in this act unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context:* * *12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 (bb) The term "accessory dwelling unit" means one or more rooms that are located within a principle residence, or within an accessory structure on the same lot as a principal residence, that is designed, arranged and intended to be occupied by not more than one household as living accommodations independent from any other household and is so occupied or vacant.(cc) The term "adverse action" means:(1) refusing to engage in or negotiate a rental real estate transaction;(2) denying tenancy;(3) representing that a housing accommodation is not available for inspection, rental or lease when in fact it is so available;(4) failing or refusing to add a household member to an existing lease;(5) expelling or evicting, or threatening to expel or evict, an occupant from a housing accommodation or otherwise making unavailable or denying a housing accommodation;(6) creating conditions that make a housing accommodation uninhabitable or unsafe for an occupant;(7) applying different terms, conditions or privileges to a rental real estate transaction, including, but not limited to, the setting of rates for rental or lease, establishment of damage deposits or other financial conditions for rental or lease or in the furnishing of facilities or services in connection with the transaction;(8) refusing or intentionally failing to list a housing accommodation for rent or lease;(9) refusing or intentionally failing to show a housing accommodation listed for rent or lease;20250SB0643PN0655 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (10) refusing or intentionally failing to accept or transmit a reasonable offer to lease or rent a housing accommodation;(11) terminating a lease; or(12) threatening, penalizing, retaliating or otherwise discriminating against an individual for any reason prohibited by section 5.4.(dd) The term "arrest record" means information indicating that a person has been apprehended, detained, taken into custody, held for investigation or restrained by a law enforcement department, military authority or United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement due to an accusation or suspicion that the person committed a crime. The term includes a pending criminal charge where the accusation has not yet resulted in a final judgment, disposition, adjudication, acquittal, conviction, plea, dismissal or withdrawal.(ee) The term "consumer report" means a written, oral or other communication of information by a consumer reporting agency bearing on a consumer's creditworthiness, credit standing or credit capacity.(ff) The term "consumer reporting agency" means a person which, for monetary fees, dues or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing consumer reports to third parties.(gg) The term "conviction record" means information regarding a finding or verdict of guilty, an adjudication of delinquency whether deferred or otherwise, a final disposition of a summary offense, an admission of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere.20250SB0643PN0655 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (hh) The term "criminal history" has the same meaning as criminal history record information in 18 Pa.C.S. § 9102 (relating to definitions).(ii) The term "fair chance housing" means a practice that reduces barriers to housing accommodations for persons with criminal histories in accordance with section 5.4.(jj) The term "landlord" means a person that owns, manages or operates a housing accommodation for rent or a housing accommodation that is offered or advertised as available for rent.(kk) The term "legitimate business reason" means a reason that exists when a policy or practice is necessary to protect resident safety or to protect property, in light of the following factors:(1) The nature and the severity of the offense underlying the conviction as indicated by the Commonwealth through such techniques as gradation and gravity score.(2) The time that has elapsed since the date of conviction, provided that the landlord may not consider a conviction that occurred more than two years prior to the adverse action as a factor supporting a legitimate business reason for taking an adverse action. For purposes of this subclause, the term "conviction" means a finding of guilt or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, whether or not a judgment of sentence has been imposed as determined by the law of the jurisdiction in which the prosecution was held, except that the term does not include a conviction that has been expunged or overturned or for which an individual has been pardoned or an order of accelerated rehabilitative disposition.(3) Supplemental information related to the person's 20250SB0643PN0655 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 rehabilitation, good conduct and additional facts or explanations provided by the person, if the person chooses to do so. For purposes of this subclause, review of conviction information is limited to those convictions included in registry information.(ll) The term "minor" means an individual under the age of 18 years.(mm) The term "prospective occupant" means a person who seeks to lease, sublease or rent a housing accommodation.(nn) The term "registry information" means information solely obtained from a county, statewide or national sex offender registry, including a registrant's physical description, address and conviction description and dates.(oo) The term "supplemental information" means information produced by a prospective occupant or tenant, or produced on the individual's behalf, with respect to the individual's rehabilitation or good conduct, including:(1) written or oral statement from the prospective occupant or the tenant;(2) written or oral statement from a current or previous employer;(3) written or oral statement from a current or previous landlord;(4) written or oral statement from a member of the judiciary or law enforcement, parole or probation officer or person that provides similar services;(5) written or oral statement from a member of the clergy, counselor, therapist, social worker, community or volunteer organization or person or institution that provides similar services;20250SB0643PN0655 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) certificate of rehabilitation;(7) certificate of completion or enrollment in an educational or vocational training program, including an apprenticeship program; or(8) certificate of completion or enrollment in a drug or alcohol treatment program or certificate of completion or enrollment in a rehabilitation program.(pp) The term "tenant" means an individual who occupies or holds possession of a housing accommodation according to a rental agreement.Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 5.4. Prohibited Use of Criminal History.--(a) It is an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person to:(1) Advertise, publicize or implement a policy or practice that automatically or categorically excludes individuals with an arrest record, conviction record, conditions of sentence or criminal history from a housing accommodation offered for rent or lease.(2) Require disclosure, inquire about or take an adverse action against a prospective occupant, a tenant or a member of their household, based on an arrest record, conviction record, or criminal history, except for information under paragraph (3) and subject to the exclusions and legal requirements in section 5.7.(3) Carry out an adverse action based on registry information of a prospective adult occupant, an adult tenant or an adult member of their household, unless the landlord has a legitimate business reason for taking the action.(4) Carry out an adverse action based on registry information regarding a prospective occupant who is a minor, a 20250SB0643PN0655 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 minor tenant or a minor member of their household.(5) Carry out an adverse action based on registry information regarding a prospective occupant who is an adult, an adult tenant or an adult member of their household if the conviction occurred when the individual was a minor or a minor tried as an adult.(b) If a landlord takes an adverse action based on a legitimate business reason, the landlord shall provide written notice by email, mail or in person of the adverse action to the prospective occupant or the tenant and state the specific registry information that was the basis for the adverse action. If a prospective occupant provides supplemental information regarding rehabilitation, the landlord must explain why, in light of the supplemental information, a legitimate business reason remains.(c) If a consumer report is used by a landlord as part of the screening process, the landlord must provide a free copy of the consumer report to the prospective occupant or tenant in the event of a denial or other adverse action, and the landlord must provide the prospective occupant or tenant with an opportunity to dispute the accuracy of information appearing in the consumer report.Section 5.5. Retaliation Prohibited Relating to Use of Criminal History.--(a) It is an unlawful discriminatory practice for any person to:(1) Interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of, or the attempt to exercise, a right protected under section 5.4.(2) Take adverse action against another person because the other person exercised in good faith the rights protected under section 5.4. The rights include the following:20250SB0643PN0655 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The right to fair chance housing accommodations and regulation of the use of criminal history under section 5.4.(ii) The right to make inquiries about the rights protected under section 5.4.(iii) The right to inform others about their rights under section 5.4.(iv) The right to inform the person's legal counsel or another person about an alleged violation of section 5.4.(v) The right to file an oral or written complaint with the Commission for an alleged violation of section 5.4.(vi) The right to cooperate with the Commission in its investigations of section 5.4.(vii) The right to testify in a proceeding under or related to section 5.4.(viii) The right to refuse to participate in an activity that would result in a violation of section 5.4.(ix) The right to oppose any policy, practice or act that is unlawful under section 5.4.(3) Communicate to another person exercising rights protected under this section, directly or indirectly, the willingness to inform a government employee that the other person is not lawfully in the United States or to report, or to make an implied or express assertion of a willingness to report, suspected citizenship or immigration status of a prospective occupant, a tenant or a member of their household to a Federal, State or local agency because the prospective occupant or tenant has exercised a right under this section or section 5.4.(4) Communicate to another person exercising rights protected under this section, directly or indirectly, the willingness to take an action so as to cause an issue with the 20250SB0643PN0655 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other person's probation or parole through contacting a person responsible for the other person's supervision.(b) It shall be a rebuttable presumption of retaliation if a landlord or person takes an adverse action against another person within 90 days of the other person's exercise of rights protected under this section. The landlord or person who took the adverse action may rebut the presumption with clear and convincing evidence that the adverse action was taken for a permissible purpose.(c) Proof of retaliation under this section shall be sufficient upon a showing that a landlord or person has taken an adverse action against another person and the other person's exercise of rights protected under this section was a motivating factor in the adverse action, unless the landlord or person who took the adverse action can prove that the action would have been taken in the absence of the protected activity.(d) The protections afforded under this section shall apply to a person who mistakenly, but in good faith, alleges violations of this section and section 5.4.(e) A complaint or other communication by any person triggers the protections of this section regardless of whether the complaint or communication is in writing or makes explicit reference to this section or section 5.4.Section 5.6. Notice to Prospective Occupants and Tenants Relating to Use of Criminal History.--(a) A landlord shall provide written notice to prospective occupants and tenants that the landlord is prohibited from requiring disclosure, asking about, rejecting an applicant or taking adverse action based on an arrest record, conviction record or criminal history, except for information under section 5.4(a)(3) and subject to the 20250SB0643PN0655 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exclusions and legal requirements in section 5.7.(b) If the landlord uses a criminal history record check on a prospective occupant or tenant for information under section 5.4(a)(3), the landlord must provide a free copy of the criminal history record check to the prospective tenant or occupant.(c) If a landlord screens prospective occupants under section 5.4(a)(3), the landlord must provide notice of an applicant's ability to provide supplemental information related to the applicant's rehabilitation, good conduct and facts or explanations regarding the applicant's registry information. (d) The Commission shall adopt a rule or rules to enforce this section.Section 5.7. Exclusions and Other Legal Requirements Relating to Use of Criminal History.--(a) Sections 5.4 and 5.5 shall not be interpreted or applied to diminish or conflict with a requirement of Federal or State law. In the event of a conflict, the Federal or State law requirement shall supersede the requirements of this section.(b) Sections 5.4 and 5.5 shall not apply to the renting, subrenting, leasing or subleasing of the personal residence of the landlord.(c) Sections 5.4 and 5.5 shall not apply to the renting, subrenting, leasing or subleasing of an accessory dwelling unit or detached accessory dwelling unit in which the owner or person entitled to possession maintains a bona fide residence, home or abode on the same lot.(d) Sections 5.4 and 5.5 shall not be construed to discourage or prohibit a landlord from adopting screening policies that are more generous to prospective occupants and tenants than the requirements of those sections.20250SB0643PN0655 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Sections 9(f)(1) and (2) introductory paragraph, (f.1) and (f.2) and 9.3 of the act are amended to read:Section 9. Procedure.--* * *(f) (1) If, upon all the evidence at the hearing, the Commission shall find that a respondent has engaged in or is engaging in any unlawful discriminatory practice as defined in this act, the Commission shall state its findings of fact, and shall issue and cause to be served on such respondent an order requiring such respondent to cease and desist from such unlawful discriminatory practice and to take such affirmative action, including, but not limited to, reimbursement of certifiable travel expenses in matters involving the complaint, compensation for loss of work in matters involving the complaint, hiring, reinstatement or upgrading of employes, with or without back pay, admission or restoration to membership in any respondent labor organization, the making of reasonable accommodations, or selling or leasing specified housing accommodations or commercial property upon such equal terms and conditions and with such equal facilities, services and privileges or lending money, whether or not secured by mortgage or otherwise for the acquisition, construction, rehabilitation, repair or maintenance of housing accommodations or commercial property, upon such equal terms and conditions to any person discriminated against or all persons, and any other verifiable, reasonable out-of-pocket expenses caused by such unlawful discriminatory practice, provided that, in those cases alleging a violation of section 5(d), (e) or (h) or 5.3 where the underlying complaint is a violation of section 5(h) or 5.3, or in those cases alleging a violation of section 5.4 or 5.5, the Commission may award actual damages, including damages caused by humiliation and 20250SB0643PN0655 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 embarrassment, as, in the judgment of the Commission, will effectuate the purposes of this act, and including a requirement for report of the manner of compliance.(2) Such order may also assess a civil penalty against the respondent in a complaint of discrimination filed under sections 5(h) [or], 5.3, 5.4 or 5.5:* * *(f.1) If, upon all the evidence at the hearing, in those cases alleging a violation of section 5(d), (e), (h) or 5.3 where the underlying complaint is a violation of section 5(h) or 5.3, or in those cases alleging a violation of section 5.4 or 5.5, the Commission finds that a respondent has engaged in or is engaging in any unlawful discriminatory practice as defined in this act, the Commission may award attorney fees and costs to prevailing complainants.(f.2) If, upon all the evidence at the hearing, in those cases alleging a violation of section 5(d), (e), (h) or 5.3 where the underlying complaint is a violation of section 5(h) or 5.3, or in those cases alleging a violation of section 5.4 or 5.5, the Commission finds that a respondent has not engaged in or is not engaging in any unlawful discriminatory practice as defined in this act, the Commission may award attorney fees and costs to a prevailing respondent if the respondent proves that the complaint was brought in bad faith.* * *Section 9.3. Civil Penalties.--The Commission shall have the power to adopt a schedule of civil penalties for violation of section 5(h)(5) or 5.4(a)(1) by the advertiser and the publisher in instances where the complainant does not take action to secure housing accommodations or financing and is not denied 20250SB0643PN0655 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 housing accommodations or financing based on the alleged discriminatory language in the advertisement. The schedule of penalties, guidelines for their imposition and procedures for appeal shall be published in the Pennsylvania Bulletin, provided that the Commission shall, within two (2) years of such publication, promulgate a regulation setting forth the schedule of penalties, guidelines and procedures. Any such penalty shall not exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500.00). Duly authorized agents of the Commission shall have the power and authority to issue citations and impose penalties for any such violations. Any such penalty imposed may be appealed to the Commission pursuant to regulations promulgated under this act. All proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0643PN0655 - 13 - 12345678910111213141516